California statutes. Corporations Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, if in his or her opinion the public interest and the protection of investors so require, the commissioner is authorized summarily to suspend all over-the-counter trading in this state by broker-dealers and agents in any security or summarily to suspend all trading on a national securities exchange located in this state in any security (provided, in the case of trading on that exchange, that the security is not listed on any national securities exchange located outside this state on which trading has not been suspended) for a period not exceeding 90 days, and for successive periods of 90 days. No broker-dealer or agent shall effect any transaction (other than an unsolicited brokerage transaction effected on a national securities exchange located outside this
 state) in, or induce or attempt to induce the purchase or sale of, any security in this state in which trading is in any manner suspended under this section, except in performance of a contract previously entered into.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 131, Sec. 13.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25220.

At any time after the issuance of an order under Section 25219, any interested person (including, but not limited to, the issuer of the security and any broker-dealer who has been making a market in the security) may in writing request that the suspension of trading be rescinded. Upon the receipt of such a written request, the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within 15 business days after such receipt unless the person making the request consents to a later date. After such hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in connection with which the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted thereunder, the commissioner may order such suspension to be continued until modified or rescinded by further order of the commissioner if he finds that trading in the security will be unfair, unjust, or inequitable to investors or will tend to work a fraud upon the purchasers or sellers of such security. Otherwise, he shall rescind the suspension of trading and no further orders may be entered under Section 25219 with respect to the same security in the absence of changed circumstances justifying such order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

25221.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a broker-dealer, or any affiliate thereof, licensed under this chapter, or any officer or employee thereof, may submit to the Department of Justice fingerprints of an applicant for employment for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a record of a conviction and of an arrest for which the Department of Justice establishes that the applicant was released on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial. Fingerprints taken pursuant to this section include fingerprints taken by the use of fingerprint live-scan technology, as described in Section 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide the following information to the broker-dealer, affiliate, or officer or employee thereof pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Every conviction rendered against the applicant.

(2) Every arrest for which the Department of Justice establishes that the applicant was released on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Licensing and Notice Filing Requirements of Investment Adviser Representatives and Investment Advisers [25230. - 25238.]

25230.

(a) It is unlawful for any investment adviser to conduct business as an investment adviser in this state unless the investment adviser has first applied for and secured from the commissioner a certificate, then in effect, authorizing the investment adviser to do so or unless the investment adviser is exempted by the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25200) of this part or unless the investment adviser is subject to Section 25230.1.

(b) No person, on behalf of an investment adviser that has obtained a certificate pursuant to Section 25231, may, in this state: offer or negotiate for the sale of investment advisory services of the investment adviser; determine which recommendations shall be made to, make recommendations to, or manage the accounts of, clients of the investment adviser; or determine the reports or analyses concerning securities to be published by the investment adviser, unless the investment adviser and that person have complied with rules that the commissioner may adopt for the qualification and employment of those persons.

(c) The commissioner may, consistent with Section 25232.1, review the disciplinary history of an investment adviser representative upon the filing of notice of any of the following:

(1) The employment, association, or transfer of the investment adviser representative.

(2) An amendment to the information filed by the investment adviser representative at the time of employment, association, or transfer.

(3) The termination of employment or association of the investment adviser representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25230.1.

(a) A person that is registered under Section 203 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 as an investment adviser is not subject to the requirement of obtaining a certificate under Section 25230, but may not conduct business in this state unless the person has fewer than six clients as specified in Section 25202 or unless the person first complies with subdivision (b). An investment adviser representative that has a place of business in this state may be required to obtain a certificate pursuant to Section 25231.

(b) A person subject to subdivision (a) shall:

(1) File with the commissioner an annual notice, consisting of those documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the securities laws that the commissioner by rule or order deems appropriate or, in lieu thereof, a form prescribed by the commissioner, and a consent to service of process under Section 25240.

(2) Pay the notice filing fee provided for in subdivision (d) of Section 25608.1.

(c) No investment adviser representative, on behalf of an investment adviser subject to subdivision (a), may, in this state: offer or negotiate for the sale of investment advisory services of the investment adviser; determine which recommendations shall be made to, make recommendations to, or manage the accounts of, clients of the investment adviser; or determine the reports or analysis concerning securities to be published by the investment adviser, unless the investment adviser representative has complied with rules that the commissioner may adopt for the qualification and employment of investment adviser representatives.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit the commissioner from investigating and bringing enforcement actions with respect to fraud or deceit, including and without limitation, fraud or deceit under Section 25235 and the rules of the commissioner adopted thereunder, against an investment adviser or an investment adviser representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 48, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25231.

(a) Any investment adviser, or any person who contemplates becoming an investment adviser, may apply for a certificate to act as an investment adviser by filing with the commissioner an application. The application shall be accompanied by the consent to service of process specified in Section 25240 and shall contain information, in such form and detail, as the commissioner may by rule prescribe.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by rule or order of the commissioner, all investment adviser and investment adviser representative applications, amendments, reports, notices, related filings, and fees required to be filed with the commissioner pursuant to this title shall be filed electronically with and transmitted to the Web-based
 Investment Adviser Registration Depository operated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 131, Sec. 14.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25232.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order censure, deny a certificate to, or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months or revoke the certificate of, an investment adviser, if the commissioner finds that the censure, denial, suspension, or revocation is in the public interest and that the investment adviser, whether prior or subsequent to becoming such, or any partner, officer or director thereof or any person performing similar functions or any person directly or indirectly controlling the investment adviser, whether prior or subsequent to becoming such, or any employee of the investment adviser while so employed has done any of the following:

(a) Has willfully made or caused to be made in any application for a certificate or any report filed with the commissioner under this division, or in any proceeding before the commissioner, any statement which was at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has willfully omitted to state in the application or report any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(b) Has been either (1) convicted of or has pled nolo contendere to any felony or misdemeanor, or (2) held liable in a civil action by final judgment of a court based upon conduct showing moral turpitude, and the commissioner finds that the felony, misdemeanor or civil action (A) involved the purchase or sale of any security, (B) arose out of the conduct of the business of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, (C) involved theft, or (D) involved the violation of Section 1341, 1342, or 1343 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(c) Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by order, judgment, or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction from acting as an investment adviser, underwriter or broker-dealer or as an affiliated person or employee of any investment company, bank, or insurance company, or from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice in connection with that activity, or in connection with the purchase or sale of any security.

(d) Is or has been subject to (1) any order of the Securities and Exchange Commission or the securities administrator of any other state denying or revoking or suspending his or her registration as an investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or as a broker or dealer or agent, (2) any order of any national securities association or national securities exchange (registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) suspending or expelling him or her from membership in that association or exchange or from association with any member thereof, or (3) any other order of the commission or any administrator, association, or exchange referred to in this subdivision which is or has been necessary for the protection of any investor.

(e) Has willfully violated any provision of the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the Investment Company Act of 1940, the Commodity Exchange Act, or Title 4 (commencing with Section 25000), including the Franchise Investment Law, Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000), or the California Commodity Law of 1990, Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 29500), or of any rule or regulation under any of those statutes, or any order of the commissioner which is or has been necessary for the protection of any investor.

(f) Is or has been subject to (1) any order of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission denying registration to, or revoking or suspending the registration of, that person under the Commodity Exchange Act, (2) any order of any board of trade or commodity exchange, including, but not limited to, the New York Mercantile Exchange, the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, the Chicago Board of Trade, or the Chicago Board Options Exchange, suspending or expelling that person from membership in the board of trade or commodity exchange or from association with any member thereof, or (3) any other order of the commission or any board or exchange referred to in this subdivision which is or has been necessary for the protection of any investor.

(g) Has aided, abetted, counseled, commanded, induced, or procured the violation by any other person of any statute or rule or regulation referred to in subdivision (e).

(h) Has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or, in the case of an applicant only, any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25232.1.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order censure, or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management or control of any investment adviser, broker-dealer or commodity adviser, any officer, director, partner, employee of, or person performing similar functions for, an investment adviser, or any other person, if he or she finds that the censure, suspension or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed any act or omission enumerated in subdivision (a), (e), (f), or (g) of Section 25232 or has been convicted of any offense or held liable in any civil action specified in subdivision (b) of Section 25232 or is enjoined from any act, conduct or practice specified in subdivision (c) of Section 25232 or is subject to any order specified in subdivision (d) of Section 25232.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 772, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25232.2.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, as to whom an order suspending or revoking the person’s certificate as an investment adviser is in effect pursuant to Section 25232 or as to whom an order suspending or barring employment is in effect pursuant to Section 25232.1, willfully to become or to be employed by any investment adviser, broker-dealer or commodity adviser, without the consent of the commissioner, and it is unlawful for any investment adviser to permit a person as to whom an order is in effect pursuant to Section 25212.1 or 25232.1 to become or to remain employed by the investment adviser, without the consent of the commissioner, if such investment adviser knew, or in the exercise of reasonable care should have known, of such order.

(b) Any person as to whom an order suspending or barring employment with or participation is issued pursuant to Section 25232.1 may petition the commissioner for reinstatement or reduction of penalty as provided in and subject to the provisions of Section 11522 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1120, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1981.   Operative November 1, 1981, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

25232.3.

The commissioner may immediately revoke the certificate of any investment adviser if the investment adviser fails to comply with any currently effective order of the commissioner which is necessary for the protection of any investor, unless the investment adviser secures a court order restraining the enforcement of the commissioner’s revocation order within 10 days of the date the order is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 772, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25233.

No order may be entered under Section 25232, 25232.1, or 25252 except after notice to the person affected thereby of the intention of the commissioner to enter that order and of the reasons therefor and that upon receipt of a request the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within 15 business days after that receipt unless the person affected consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after the mailing of that notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order may be entered without hearing to remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the commissioner. In the case of an original application for a certificate, such a hearing shall be set down to commence within 15 business days after receipt of a written request by the applicant made 30 days or more after the filing of the application, even though no such notice by the commissioner has been given, unless the applicant consents to a later date. If a hearing is requested or ordered, it shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 391, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25234.

(a) No investment adviser licensed under this chapter shall in this state enter into, extend or renew any investment advisory contract, or in any way perform any investment advisory contract entered into, extended or renewed on or after the effective date of this law, if that contract:

(1) Provides for compensation to the investment adviser on the basis of a share of capital gains upon or capital appreciation of the funds or any portion of the funds of the client, except as may be permitted by rule or order of the commissioner;

(2) Fails to provide, in substance, that no assignment of the contract shall be made by the investment adviser without the consent of the other party to the contract;

(3) Fails to provide, in substance, that the investment adviser, if a partnership, will notify the other party to the contract of any change in the membership of the partnership within a reasonable time after the change.

(b) As used in this section, “investment advisory contract” means any contract or agreement whereby a person agrees to act as investment adviser or to manage any investment or trading account for a person other than an investment company. Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of this section does not prohibit an investment advisory contract that provides for compensation based upon the total value of a fund averaged over a definite period, or as of definite dates, or taken as of a definite date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25235.

It is unlawful for any investment adviser, directly or indirectly, in this state:

(a) To employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud any client or prospective client.

(b) To engage in any transaction, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any client or prospective client. 

(c) Acting as principal for his own account, knowingly to sell any security to or purchase any security from a client for whom he is acting as investment adviser, or, acting as broker for a person other than such client, knowingly to effect any sale or purchase of any security for the account of such client, without disclosing to such client in writing before the completion of the transaction the capacity in which he is acting and obtaining the written consent of the client to such transaction.

(d) To engage in any act, practice, or course of business which is fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative. The commissioner shall, for the purpose of this subdivision, by rule define and prescribe means reasonably designed to prevent such acts, practices, and courses of business as are fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative.

(e) To represent that he is an investment counsel or to use the name “investment counsel” as descriptive of his business unless his principal business consists of acting as investment adviser and a substantial part of his business consists of rendering investment advisory services on the basis of the individual needs of his clients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25236.

(a) No investment adviser licensed under this chapter shall conduct any business as such investment adviser in this state unless the investment adviser and all natural persons associated with such investment adviser meet such specified and appropriate standards with respect to training, experience and other qualifications as the commissioner finds necessary or desirable. The commissioner may establish such standards by rule, which may

(1) Appropriately classify investment advisers and persons associated with investment advisers;

(2) Specify that all or any portion of such standards shall be applicable to any such class; and

(3) Require persons in any such class to pass examinations prescribed in accordance with such rules.

(b) In addition to the fees imposed by Section 25608, the commissioner may prescribe by rule reasonable fees and charges to defray the costs of carrying out this section, including, but not limited to, fees for any examination administered by him or under his direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25237.

The commissioner shall prescribe rules with respect to investment advisers licensed under this chapter who have custody of their clients’ securities or funds or who have any power of attorney from their clients to execute transactions as he or she finds to be necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors. The rules may require a minimum capital for those investment advisers or prescribe a minimum ratio between net capital and aggregate indebtedness or both, and may require a fidelity bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25238.

No investment adviser licensed under this chapter and no natural person associated with the investment adviser shall engage in investment advisory activities, or attempt to engage in investment advisory activities, in this state in contradiction of such rules as the commissioner may prescribe designed to promote fair, equitable and ethical principles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 698, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. General Provisions [25240. - 25256.]

25240.

Every applicant for a certificate as a broker-dealer or an investment adviser (other than a California corporation), and every investment adviser subject to Section 25230.1, shall file with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner or the commissioner’s successor in office to be the person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor, executor, or administrator, which arises under this law or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous application under this law (or under any prior law if the application states that such consent is still effective), or a person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous notice filed under Section 25230.1, need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not effective unless (1) the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at the person’s last address on file with the commissioner, and (2) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25241.

(a) Every broker-dealer and every investment adviser licensed under Section 25230 shall make and keep accounts, correspondence, memorandums, papers, books, and other records and shall file financial and other reports as the commissioner by rule requires, subject to the limitations of Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 with respect to broker-dealers and Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 with respect to investment advisers.

(b) All records so required shall be preserved for the time specified in the rule.

(c) All records referred to in this section are subject at any time and from time to time to reasonable periodic, special, or other examinations by the commissioner, within or without this state, as the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(d) For the purpose of avoiding unnecessary duplications of examinations, the commissioner, insofar as he or she deems it practicable in administering this section, may cooperate with the securities administrators of other states, the Securities and Exchange Commission and any national securities exchange or national securities association.

(e) Unless otherwise provided by rule, every investment adviser subject to Section 25230 and every broker-dealer, including an applicant for a license under Section 25210 or 25230, shall furnish an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of the licensee’s broker-dealer or investment adviser business pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25242.

(a) Surrender of a certificate as a broker-dealer or investment adviser becomes effective 30 days after receipt of an application to surrender that certificate or within a shorter period of time as the commissioner may determine, unless a revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is filed or a proceeding to revoke or suspend or to impose conditions upon the withdrawal is instituted within 30 days after the application is filed. If a proceeding is pending or instituted, withdrawal becomes effective at a time and upon any conditions as the commissioner by order determines.

(b) If the commissioner finds that any broker-dealer or investment adviser is no longer in existence, or has ceased to do business as a broker-dealer or investment adviser, or is subject to an adjudication of mental incompetence or to the control of a committee or conservator or guardian, or cannot be located after reasonable search, the commissioner may by order summarily revoke the certificate of that broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(c) The commissioner may summarily suspend or revoke the certificate of a broker-dealer or investment adviser if he or she (1) fails to pay any fee required by Section 25608 or imposed pursuant to Section 25217, 25218 or 25236 within 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the fee is due and unpaid, (2) fails to file any report required under Section 25241 within 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the report is due, (3) fails to maintain any bond required by subdivision (e) of Section 25216 or by Section 25237, (4) fails to file an application pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25211 when required by subdivision (c) of that section, within the time specified therein or within 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the application is required, whichever last occurs, (5) fails to maintain any capital required by subdivision (c) of Section 25216 or by Section 25237, or (6) fails to maintain records as required by Section 25241.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 391, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25243.

It is unlawful for any person holding a certificate as a broker-dealer or investment adviser under this part to represent or imply in any manner whatsoever that such person has been sponsored, recommended, or approved or that the person’s abilities or qualifications have in any respect been passed upon by the commissioner. Nothing in this section prohibits a statement (other than in a paid advertisement) that a person holds a certificate under this law, if such statement is true in fact and if the effect of such licensing is not misrepresented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1120, Sec. 8.   Effective October 2, 1981.   Operative November 1, 1981, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

25243.5.

(a) A broker-dealer or investment adviser, or an agent or representative thereof, shall not use a senior-specific certification, credential, or professional designation in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of securities, or the provision of advice as to the value of or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities, either directly or indirectly or through publications or writings or by issuing or promulgating analyses or reports relating to securities, that indicates or implies that the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or an agent or representative thereof, has special certification or training in advising or servicing senior citizens or retirees, in such a way as to mislead any person.

(b) The prohibited use of these
 certifications, credentials, or professional designations includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The use of a certification, credential, or professional designation by a person who has not actually earned or is otherwise ineligible to use the certification, credential, or designation.

(2) The use of a nonexistent or self-conferred certification, credential, or professional designation.

(3) The use of a certification, credential, or professional designation that indicates or implies a level of occupational qualifications obtained through education, training, or experience that the person using the certification, credential, or professional designation does not have.

(4) The use of a certification, credential, or professional designation that
 was obtained from a designating, credentialing, or certifying organization where any of the following apply:

(A) The organization is primarily engaged in the business of instruction in sales marketing.

(B) The organization does not have reasonable standards or procedures for assuring the competency of individuals to whom it grants a certification, credential, or professional designation.

(C) The organization does not have reasonable standards or procedures for monitoring and disciplining individuals with a certification, credential, or professional designation for improper or unethical conduct.

(D) The organization does not have reasonable continuing education requirements for individuals with a certification, credential, or professional designation in
 order to maintain the certificate, credential, or professional designation.

(c) There is a rebuttable presumption that a designating, credentialing, or certifying organization is not disqualified solely for the purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) when the organization has been accredited by the American National Standards Institute, the National Commission for Certifying Agencies, or an organization that is on the United States Department of Education’s list entitled “Accrediting Agencies Recognized for Title IV Purposes” and the certification, credential, or professional designation issued therefrom does not primarily apply to sales and/or marketing.

(d) In determining whether a combination of words, or an acronym standing for a combination of words, constitutes a certification, credential, or professional designation indicating or implying that a person has special
 certification or training in advising or serving senior citizens or retirees, factors to be considered shall include both of the following:

(1) Use of one or more word such as “senior,” “retirement,” “elder,” or like words combined with one or more words such as “certified,” “registered,” “chartered,” “adviser,” “specialist,” “consultant,” “planner,” or like words, in the name of the certification, credential, or professional designation or credential.

(2) The manner in which those words are combined.

(e) This section shall not apply to the use of a job title by a person within an organization that is licensed or registered by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation or a federal financial services regulatory agency, when that job title indicates seniority or standing within the organization, or
 specifies a person’s area of specialization within the organization. For the purposes of this subdivision, federal financial services regulatory agency includes, but is not limited to, an agency that regulates brokers or dealers, investment advisers, or investment companies as described under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 809-1 et seq.).

(f) (1) This section shall not apply to a broker or agent who is licensed by the Department of Insurance and is in compliance with the requirements of Section 787.1 of the Insurance Code.

(2) This subdivision shall be operative only if Assembly Bill 2150 of the 2007–08 Regular Session is chaptered and becomes effective and that bill adds Section 787.1 to the Insurance Code.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 74.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25244.

Any person whose certificate as a broker-dealer or investment adviser has been suspended or revoked shall immediately surrender such certificate to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1120, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1981.   Operative November 1, 1981, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

25245.

It is unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any application, notice, or report filed with the commissioner under this part, or willfully to omit to state in any such application, notice, or report any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25246.

It is unlawful for any agent or broker-dealer to require, as a condition to the purchase or sale of securities for and in the name of a married person, that the prior consent or authorization of the spouse of that person be obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1120, Sec. 10.   Effective October 2, 1981.   Operative November 1, 1981, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

25247.

(a) Upon written or oral request, the commissioner shall make available to any person the information specified in Section 7929.005 of the Government Code and made available through the Public Disclosure Program of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority with respect to any broker-dealer or agent licensed or regulated under this part. The commissioner shall also make available the current license status and the year of issuance of the license of a broker-dealer. Any information disclosed pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a public record. Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may disclose either orally or in writing that information pursuant to this subdivision. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the state, the Department of Financial
 Protection and Innovation, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for the release of any false or unauthorized information, unless the release of that information was done with knowledge and malice.

(b) Any broker-dealer or agent licensed or regulated under this part shall, upon request, deliver a written notice to any client when a new account is opened stating that information about the license status or disciplinary record of a broker-dealer or an agent may be obtained from the Division of Corporations, or from any other source that provides substantially similar information.

(c) The notice provided under subdivision (b) shall contain the office location or telephone number where the information may be obtained.

(d) A broker-dealer or agent is exempt from providing the notice required under subdivision (b) if a person who does not have a financial relationship with the broker-dealer or agent, requests only general operational information such as the nature of the broker-dealer’s or agent’s business, office location, hours of operation, basic services, and fees, but does not solicit advice regarding investments or other services offered.

(e) Upon written or oral request, the commissioner shall make available to any person the disciplinary records maintained on the Investment Adviser Registration Depository and made available through the Investment Adviser Public Disclosure internet website as to any investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or associated person of an investment adviser licensed or regulated under this part. The commissioner shall also make available the current
 license status and the year of issuance of the license of an investment adviser. Any information disclosed pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a public record. Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may disclose that information either orally or in writing pursuant to this subdivision. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the state, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for the release of any false or unauthorized information, unless the release of that information was done with knowledge and malice.

(f) Section 461 of the Business and Professions Code shall not apply to the Division of Corporations when using a national, uniform application adopted or approved for use by the Securities
 and Exchange Commission, the North American Securities Administrators Association, or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority that is required for participation in the Central Registration Depository or the Investment Adviser Registration Depository.

(g) This section shall not require the disclosure of criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation pursuant to Section 534 of Title 28 of the United States Code, and the rules thereunder, or information not otherwise subject to disclosure under the Information Practices Act of 1977.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 58) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 76.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25248.
